Washington statutes.
RCW 41.59.110

Commission, rules and regulations of—Federal precedents as standard.

(1) The commission shall promulgate, revise, or rescind, in the manner prescribed by the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, such rules and regulations as it may deem necessary and appropriate to administer the provisions of this chapter, in conformity with the intent and purpose of this chapter, and consistent with the best standards of labor-management relations.

(2) The rules, precedents, and practices of the national labor relations board, provided they are consistent with this chapter, shall be considered by the commission in its interpretation of this chapter, and prior to adoption of any aforesaid commission rules and regulations.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 288 s 12.]